North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 10. Derivative Actions.

§ 59-1001.
Right of action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-1002.
Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and (i) must have been a partner at the time of the transaction that is the subject of the complaint or (ii) the plaintiff’s status as a partner must have devolved upon the partner by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 37.

§ 59-1003.
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-1004.
Expenses.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of any action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and shall direct him to remit to the limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him.

In any such action, the court, upon final judgment and a finding that the action was brought without reasonable cause, may require the plaintiff or plaintiffs to pay to the defendant or defendants the reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, incurred by them in defense of the action.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-1005.
Dismissal of action.

Such action shall not be discontinued, dismissed, compromised or settled without the approval of the court. If the court shall determine that the interest of the partners or of the creditors of the partnership will be substantially affected by such discontinuance, dismissal, compromise, or settlement, the court, in its discretion, may direct that notice, by publication or otherwise, shall be given to such partners or creditors whose interest it determines will be so affected. If notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one or more of the parties to the action shall bear the expense of giving the same, in such amount as the court shall be awarded as costs of the action.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-1006.
Construction.

The provisions of this Article shall not be construed to deprive a partner of whatever rights of action he may possess in his individual capacity.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§§ 59-1007 through 59-1049.

Reserved for future codification purposes.